ncx.twol
Alphabet
 
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U W X Y Z
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u w x y z
 %{i%}:i %{i%}:0
 %{m%}:m %{m%}:0 
 %{M%}:m %{M%}:n 
 %>:%> ;


Sets

Vow   = A E I O U 
        a e i o u ;

Cns   = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t w x y z ;


Rules
"Morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ; 

"inmi -> in pt I"
%{m%}:m <=> i n _ %{i%}: %>: Vow ;

"inmi -> in pt II"
%{i%}:i <=> i n %{m%}: _ %>: Vow ;

"in -> inmi pt I"
%{m%}:0 <=> i n _ %{i%}: %>: Cns ;

"in -> inmi pt II"
%{i%}:0 <=> i n %{m%}: _ %>: Cns ;

"m -> n word final and before t"
%{M%}:n <=> _ .#. ;

"m -> n before t"
%{M%}:n <=> _ %>: t i %>: ;
